New York, session 2025-2026, A2238.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 4174 of the public health law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph (a-1) to read as follows: 3 (a-1) upon request, issue to any applicant, for genealogical or 4 research purposes, a copy or transcript of the record of any death 5 registered under the provisions of this chapter, which shall not include 6 therein the cause of death of the decedent nor the medical certificate; 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04782-01-5